California statutes. Labor Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 876, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

3213.

In the case of a member of the University of California Police Department who has graduated from an academy certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, when he and all members of the campus department of which he is a member have graduated from such an academy, and when any such member is employed upon a regular, full-time salary, the term “injury” as used in this division includes heart trouble and pneumonia which develops or manifests itself during a period while such member is in the service of such campus department of the University of California Police Department. The compensation which is awarded for such heart trouble or pneumonia shall include
 full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits as provided by the provisions of this division.

Such heart trouble or pneumonia so developing or manifesting itself shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment; provided, however, that the member of the University of California Police Department shall have served five years or more in such capacity before the presumption shall arise as to the compensability of heart trouble so developing or manifesting itself. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with it. This presumption shall be extended to a member following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.

Such heart trouble or pneumonia so developing or manifesting itself in such cases shall in no case be attributed to any disease existing prior to such development or manifestation.

As used in this section:

(a) “Members” shall be limited to those employees of the University of California Police Department who are defined as peace officers in Section 830.2 of the Penal Code.

(b) “Campus” shall include any campus or other installation maintained under the jurisdiction of the Regents of the University of California.

(c) “Campus department” means all members of the University of California Police Department who are assigned and serve on a particular campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 466.)
-------------------------------------------

3213.2.

(a) In the case of a member of a police department of a city, county, or city and county, or a member of the sheriff’s office of a county, or a peace officer employed by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, or a peace officer employed by the University of California, who has been employed for at least five years as a peace officer on a regular, full-time salary and has been required to wear a duty belt as a condition of employment, the term “injury,” as used in this division, includes lower back impairments. The compensation that is
 awarded for lower back impairments shall include full hospital, surgical, medical treatment, disability indemnity, and death benefits as provided by the provisions of this division.

(b) The lower back impairment so developing or manifesting itself in the peace officer shall be presumed to arise out of and in the course of the employment. This presumption is disputable and may be controverted by other evidence, but unless so controverted, the appeals board is bound to find in accordance with it. This presumption shall be extended to a person following termination of service for a period of three calendar months for each full year of the requisite service, but not to exceed 60 months in any circumstance, commencing with the last date actually worked in the specified capacity.

(c) For purposes of this section, “duty belt” means a belt used for the purpose of holding a gun, handcuffs,
 baton, and other items related to law enforcement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 834, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

3214.

(a) The Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority shall, in conjunction with all recognized employee representative associations, develop policy and implement the workers’ compensation early intervention program by December 31, 1989, for all department employees who sustain an injury. The program shall include, but not be limited to, counseling by an authorized independent early intervention counselor and the services of an agreed medical panel to assist in timely decisions regarding compensability. Costs of services
 through early intervention shall be borne by the departments.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce all costs associated with the delivery of workers’ compensation benefits, in balance with the need to ensure timely and adequate benefits to the injured worker. Toward this goal the workers’ compensation early intervention program was established in the Department of Corrections and the Department of the Youth Authority. The fundamental concept of the program is to settle disputes rather than to litigate them. This is a worthwhile concept in terms of cost control for the employer and timely receipt of benefits for the worker. To ascertain the effectiveness of the program is crucial in helping guide policy in this arena.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 157.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

3215.

Except as otherwise permitted by law, any person acting individually or through his or her employees or agents, who offers, delivers, receives, or accepts any rebate, refund, commission, preference, patronage, dividend, discount or other consideration, whether in the form of money or otherwise, as compensation or inducement for referring clients or patients to perform or obtain services or benefits pursuant to this division, is guilty of a crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 116, Sec. 26.)
-------------------------------------------

3217.

(a) Section 3215 shall not be construed to prevent the recommendation of professional employment where that recommendation is not prohibited by the Rules of Professional Conduct of the State Bar. 

(b) Section 3215 shall not be construed to prohibit a public defender or assigned counsel from making known his or her availability as a criminal defense attorney to persons unable to afford legal counsel, whether or not those persons are in custody. 

(c) Any person who commits an act that violates both Section 3215 and either Section 650 of the Business and Professions Code or Section 750 of the Insurance Code shall, upon conviction, have judgment and sentence imposed for only one violation for any act.

(d) Section 3215 shall not be construed to prohibit the payment or receipt of consideration or services that is lawful pursuant to Section 650 of the Business and Professions Code.

(e) Notwithstanding Sections 3215 and 3219, and Section 750 of the Insurance Code, nothing shall prevent an attorney at law or a law firm from providing any person or entity with legal advice, information, or legal services, including the providing of printed, copied, or written documents, either without charge or for an otherwise lawfully agreed upon attorney fee.

(f) Section 3215 shall not be construed to prohibit a workers’ compensation insurer from offering, and an employer from accepting, a workers’ compensation insurance policy with rates that reflect premium discounts based upon the employer securing coverage for occupational or nonoccupational illnesses or injuries from a health care service plan or disability insurer that is owned by, affiliated with, or has a contractual relationship with, the workers’ compensation insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 886, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

3218.

A violation of Section 3215 is a public offense punishable upon a first conviction by incarceration in the county jail for not more than one year, or by incarceration in the state prison, or by a fine not exceeding ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by both incarceration and fine. A second or subsequent conviction is punishable by incarceration in state prison.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 116, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

3219.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise permitted by law, any person acting individually or through his or her employees or agents, who offers or delivers any rebate, refund, commission, preference, patronage, dividend, discount, or other consideration to any adjuster of claims for compensation, as defined in Section 3207, as compensation, inducement, or reward for the referral or settlement of any claim, is guilty of a felony.

(2) Except as otherwise permitted by law, any
 adjuster of claims for compensation, as defined in Section 3207, who accepts or receives any rebate, refund, commission, preference, patronage, dividend, discount, or other consideration, as compensation, inducement, or reward for the referral or settlement of any claim, is guilty of a felony.

(b) Any contract for professional services secured by any medical clinic, laboratory, physician or other health care provider in this state in violation of Section 550 of the Penal Code, Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, Section 650 or 651 of the Business and Professions Code, or Section 3215 or subdivision (a) of Section 3219 of this code is void. In any action against any medical clinic, laboratory, physician, or other health care provider, or the owners or operators thereof, under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code, any judgment shall include an
 order divesting the medical clinic, laboratory, physician, or other health care provider, and the owners and operators thereof, of any fees and other compensation received pursuant to any such void contract. Those fees and compensation shall be recoverable as additional civil penalties under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) or Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 17200) of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code. The judgment may also include an order prohibiting the person from further participating in any manner in the entity in which that person directly or indirectly owned or operated for a time period that the court deems appropriate. For the purpose of this section, “operated” means participated in the management, direction, or control of the entity.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 17206 or any other provision of law, any fees recovered pursuant to subdivision (b) in an action involving professional services related to the
 provision of workers’ compensation shall be allocated as follows: if the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the State General Fund, and one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the Workers’ Compensation Fraud Account in the Insurance Fund; if the action is brought by a district attorney, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered, and one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the Workers’ Compensation Fraud Account in the Insurance Fund; if the action is brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the city in which the judgment was entered, and one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the Workers’ Compensation Fraud Account in the Insurance Fund. Moneys deposited into the Workers’ Compensation Fraud Account pursuant to this subdivision shall be used in the investigation and
 prosecution of workers’ compensation fraud, as appropriated by the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 120, Sec. 4.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Employers, Employees, and Dependents [3300. - 3553.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employers [3300. - 3302.]

3300.

As used in this division, “employer” means:

(a) The State and every State agency.

(b) Each county, city, district, and all public and quasi public corporations and public agencies therein.

(c) Every person including any public service corporation, which has any natural person in service.

(d) The legal representative of any deceased employer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3301.

As used in this division, “employer” excludes the following:

(a) Any person while acting solely as the sponsor of a bowling team.

(b) Any private, nonprofit organization while acting solely as the sponsor of a person who, as a condition of sentencing by a superior or municipal court, is performing services for the organization.

The exclusions of this section do not exclude any person or organization from the application of this division which is otherwise an employer for the purposes of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 21, Sec. 7.   Effective April 18, 1981.)
-------------------------------------------

3302.

(a) (1) When a licensed contractor enters an agreement with a temporary employment agency, employment referral service, labor contractor, or other similar entity for the entity to supply the contractor with an individual to perform acts or contracts for which the contractor’s license is required under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code and the licensed contractor is responsible for supervising the employee’s work, the temporary employment agency, employment referral service, labor contractor, or other similar entity shall pay workers’ compensation premiums based on the contractor’s experience modification rating.

(2) The temporary employment agency, employment referral service, labor contractor, or other similar entity described in paragraph (1) shall report to the insurer both of the following:

(A) Its payroll on a monthly basis in sufficient detail to allow the insurer to determine the number of workers provided and the wages paid to these workers during the period the workers were supplied to the licensed contractor.

(B) The licensed contractor’s name, address, and experience modification factor as reported by the licensed contractor.

(C) The workers’ compensation classifications associated with the payroll reported pursuant to subparagraph (A). Classifications shall be assigned in accordance with the rules set forth in the California Workers’ Compensation Uniform Statistical Reporting Plan published by the Workers’ Compensation Insurance Rating Bureau.

(b) The temporary employment agency, employment referral service, labor contractor, or other similar entity supplying the individual under the conditions specified in subdivision (a) shall be solely responsible for the individual’s workers’ compensation, as specified in subdivision (a).

(c) Nothing in this section is intended to change existing law in effect on December 31, 2002, as it relates to the sole remedy provisions of this division and the special employer provisions of Section 11663 of the Insurance Code.

(d) A licensed contractor that is using a temporary worker supplied pursuant to subdivision (a) shall notify the temporary employment agency, employment referral service, labor contractor, or other similar entity that supplied that temporary worker when either of the following occurs:

(1) The temporary worker is being used on a public works project.

(2) The contractor reassigns a temporary worker to a position other than the classification to which the worker was originally assigned.

(e) A temporary employment agency, employment referral service, labor contractor, or other similar entity may pass through to a licensed contractor any additional costs incurred as a result of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1098, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Employees [3350. - 3371.1.]

3350.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article shall govern the construction and meaning of the terms and phrases used in this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3351.

“Employee” means every person in the service of an employer under any appointment or contract of hire or apprenticeship, express or implied, oral or written, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed, and includes:

(a) Persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States and minors.

(b) All elected and appointed paid public officers.

(c) All officers and members of boards of directors of quasi-public or private corporations while rendering actual service for the corporations for pay. An officer or member of a board of directors may elect to be excluded from coverage in accordance with paragraph (16), (18), or (19) of subdivision (a) of Section
 3352.

(d) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 3352, any person employed by the owner or occupant of a residential dwelling whose duties are incidental to the ownership, maintenance, or use of the dwelling, including the care and supervision of children, or whose duties are personal and not in the course of the trade, business, profession, or occupation of the owner or occupant.

(e) All persons incarcerated in a state penal or correctional institution while engaged in assigned work or employment as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 10021 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations, or engaged in work performed under contract.

(f) All working members of a partnership or limited liability company receiving wages irrespective of profits from the partnership or
 limited liability company. A general partner of a partnership or a managing member of a limited liability company may elect to be excluded from coverage in accordance with paragraph (17) of subdivision (a) of Section 3352.

(g) A person who holds the power to revoke a trust, with respect to shares of a private corporation held in trust or general partnership or limited liability company interests held in trust. To the extent that this person is deemed to be an employee described in subdivision (c) or (f), as applicable, the person may also elect to be excluded from coverage as described in subdivision (c) or (f), as applicable, if that person otherwise meets the criteria for exclusion, as described in Section 3352.

(h) A person committed to a state hospital facility under the State Department of State Hospitals, as defined in Section 4100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, while
 engaged in and assigned work in a vocation rehabilitation program, including a sheltered workshop.

(i) Beginning on July 1, 2020, any individual who is an employee pursuant to Section
 2775. This subdivision shall not apply retroactively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 133, Sec. 1.   (AB 1766)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

3351.5.

“Employee” includes:

(a) Any person whose employment training is arranged by the State Department of Rehabilitation with any employer. Such person shall be deemed an employee of such employer for workers’ compensation purposes; provided that, the department shall bear the full amount of any additional workers’ compensation insurance premium expense incurred by the employer due to the provisions of this section.

(b) Any person defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3351 who performs domestic service comprising in-home supportive services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300), Chapter 3, Part 3, Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. For purposes of Section 3352, such person shall be deemed an employee of the recipient of such services for workers’ compensation purposes if the state or county makes or provides for direct payment to such person or to the recipient of in-home supportive services for the purchase of services, subject to the provisions of Section 12302.2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) Any person while engaged by contract for the creation of a specially ordered or commissioned work of authorship in which the parties expressly agree in a written instrument signed by them that the work shall be considered a work made for hire, as defined in Section 101 of Title 17 of the United States Code, and the ordering or commissioning party obtains ownership of all the rights comprised in the copyright in the work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1332, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3352.

(a) “Employee,” excludes the following:

(1) A person defined in subdivision (d) of Section 3351 who is employed by his or her parent, spouse, or child.

(2) A person performing services in return for aid or sustenance only, received from any religious, charitable, or relief organization.

(3) A person holding an appointment as deputy clerk or deputy sheriff appointed for his or her own convenience, and who does not receive compensation from the county or municipal corporation or from the citizens of that county or municipal corporation for his or her services as the deputy. This exclusion is operative only as to
 employment by the county or municipal corporation and does not deprive that person of recourse against a private person employing him or her for injury occurring in the course of, and arising out of, the employment.

(4) A person performing voluntary services at or for a recreational camp, hut, or lodge operated by a nonprofit organization, exempt from federal income tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, of which he or she or a member of his or her family is a member and who does not receive compensation for those services, other than meals, lodging, or transportation.

(5) A person performing voluntary service as a ski patrolman who does not receive compensation for those services, other than meals or lodging or the use of ski tow or ski lift facilities.

(6) A person employed by a ski lift operator
 to work at a snow ski area who is relieved of, and is not performing any, prescribed duties, while participating in recreational activities on his or her own initiative.

(7) A person, other than a regular employee, participating in sports or athletics who does not receive compensation for the participation other than the use of athletic equipment, uniforms, transportation, travel, meals, lodgings, or other expenses incidental thereto.

(8) A person described in subdivision (d) of Section 3351 whose employment by the employer to be held liable, during the 90 calendar days immediately preceding the date of injury, for injuries as described in Section 5411, or during the 90 calendar days immediately preceding the date of the last employment in an occupation exposing the employee to the hazards of the disease or injury, for diseases or injuries as described in Section 5412, comes
 within either of the following descriptions:

(A) The employment was, or was contracted to be, for less than 52 hours.

(B) The employment was, or was contracted to be, for wages of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

(9) A person performing voluntary service for a public agency or a private, nonprofit organization who does not receive remuneration for the services, other than meals, transportation, lodging, or reimbursement for incidental expenses.

(10) A person, other than a regular employee, performing officiating services relating to amateur sporting events sponsored by a public agency or private, nonprofit organization, who does not receive remuneration for these services, other than a stipend for each day of service no greater than the amount
 established by the Department of Human Resources as a per diem expense for employees or officers of the state. The stipend shall be presumed to cover incidental expenses involved in officiating, including, but not limited to, meals, transportation, lodging, rule books and courses, uniforms, and appropriate equipment.

(11) A student participating as an athlete in amateur sporting events sponsored by a public agency or public or private nonprofit college, university, or school, who does not receive remuneration for the participation, other than the use of athletic equipment, uniforms, transportation, travel, meals, lodgings, scholarships, grants-in-aid, or other expenses incidental thereto.

(12) A law enforcement officer who is regularly employed by a local or state law enforcement agency in an adjoining state and who is deputized to work under the supervision of a California peace
 officer pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 832.6 of the Penal Code.

(13) A law enforcement officer who is regularly employed by the Oregon State Police, the Nevada Department of Public Safety, or the Arizona Department of Public Safety and who is acting as a peace officer in this state pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 830.39 of the Penal Code.

(14) A person, other than a regular employee, performing services as a sports official for an entity sponsoring an intercollegiate or interscholastic sports event, or any person performing services as a sports official for a public agency, public entity, or a private nonprofit organization, which public agency, public entity, or private nonprofit organization sponsors an amateur sports event. For purposes of this subdivision, “sports official” includes an umpire, referee, judge, scorekeeper, timekeeper, or other
 person who is a neutral participant in a sports event.

(15) A person who is an owner-builder, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 50692 of the Health and Safety Code, who is participating in a mutual self-help housing program, as defined in Section 50087 of the Health and Safety Code, sponsored by a nonprofit corporation.

(16) (A) (i) An officer or member of the board of directors, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 3351, if he or she owns at least 10 percent of the issued and outstanding stock of the corporation, or at least 1 percent of the issued and outstanding stock of the corporation if that officer’s or member’s parent, grandparent, sibling, spouse, or child owns at least 10 percent of the issued and outstanding stock of the corporation and that officer or member is covered by a health insurance policy or a health
 care service plan, and executes a written waiver of his or her rights under this chapter stating under penalty of perjury that the person is a qualifying officer or director. The waiver shall be effective upon the date of receipt and acceptance by the corporation’s insurance carrier. The insurance carrier, with the consent of the individual executing the waiver, may elect to backdate the acceptance of the waiver up to 15 days prior to the date of receipt of the waiver. The insurance carrier, insurance agent, or insurance broker is not required to investigate, verify, or confirm the accuracy of the facts contained in the waiver. There is a conclusive presumption that a person who executes a waiver pursuant to this subdivision is not covered by workers’ compensation benefits.

(ii) A written waiver that is executed pursuant to this subparagraph, including, but not limited to, a written waiver that was executed prior to January 1, 2017, and is
 accepted by the insurance carrier on or before December 31, 2017, may be deemed to be accepted by the insurance carrier as of January 1, 2017. The written waiver shall remain in effect until the officer or member of the board of directors provides the corporation’s insurance carrier with a written withdrawal of the waiver.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an officer or director of a private corporation who is the sole shareholder of the private corporation, unless the officer, director, or private corporation has elected to be subject to liability for workers’ compensation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4151.

(17) (A) An individual who is a general partner of a partnership or a managing member of a limited liability company who executes a written waiver of his or her rights under this chapter stating under penalty of perjury that the person is a
 qualifying general partner or managing member. The waiver shall be effective upon the date of receipt and acceptance by the partnership’s or limited liability company’s insurance carrier. The insurance carrier, with the consent of the individual executing the waiver, may elect to backdate the acceptance of the waiver up to 15 days prior to the date of receipt of the waiver. The insurance carrier, insurance agent, or insurance broker is not required to investigate, verify, or confirm the accuracy of the facts contained in the waiver. There is a conclusive presumption that a person who executes a waiver pursuant to this subdivision is not covered by workers’ compensation benefits.

(B) A written waiver that is executed pursuant to this paragraph, including, but not limited to, a written waiver that was executed prior to January 1, 2017, and is accepted by the insurance carrier on or before December 31, 2017, may be deemed to be accepted by the
 insurance carrier as of January 1, 2017. The written waiver shall remain in effect until the general partner provides the partnership’s insurance carrier or the managing member provides the limited liability company’s insurance carrier with a written withdrawal of the waiver.

(18) (A) (i) An owner of a professional corporation, as defined in Section 13401 of the Corporations Code, who is a practitioner rendering the professional services for which the professional corporation is organized and who executes a document, in writing and under penalty of perjury, both waiving his or her rights under this chapter and stating that he or she is covered by a health insurance policy or a health care service plan. The owner shall provide a copy of the waiver to all other owners of the professional corporation and the professional corporation shall keep a copy of the waiver on file. The waiver is effective upon
 the date of receipt and acceptance by the professional corporation’s insurance carrier. The insurance carrier, with the consent of the individual executing the waiver, may elect to backdate the acceptance of the waiver up to 15 days prior to the date of receipt of the waiver. The insurance carrier, insurance agent, or insurance broker is not required to investigate, verify, or confirm the accuracy of the facts contained in the waiver. There is a conclusive presumption that a person who executes a waiver pursuant to this subdivision is not covered by workers’ compensation benefits.

(ii) A written waiver that is executed pursuant to this subparagraph and is accepted by the insurance carrier on or before December 31, 2017, may be deemed to be accepted by the insurance carrier as of January 1, 2017. The written waiver shall remain in effect until the owner provides the professional corporation’s insurance carrier with a written withdrawal of the
 waiver.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an owner of a private professional corporation who is the sole shareholder of the private professional corporation, unless the owner or private professional corporation has elected to be subject to liability for workers’ compensation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4151.

(19) (A) (i) An officer or member of the board of directors of a cooperative corporation organized pursuant to the Cooperative Corporation Law, as set forth in Part 2 (commencing with Section 12200) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, who executes a document, in writing and under penalty of perjury, both waiving his or her rights under this chapter and stating that he or she is covered by both a health care service plan or health insurance policy, and a disability insurance policy that is comparable in
 scope and coverage, as determined by the Insurance Commissioner, to a workers’ compensation policy. The officer or member of the board of directors shall provide a copy of the waiver to all other officers and members of the board of directors of the cooperative corporation, and the cooperative corporation shall keep a copy of the waiver on file. The waiver is effective upon the date of receipt and acceptance by the cooperative corporation’s insurance carrier. The insurance carrier, with the consent of the individual executing the waiver, may elect to backdate the acceptance of the waiver up to 15 days prior to the date of receipt of the waiver. The insurance carrier, insurance agent, or insurance broker is not required to investigate, verify, or confirm the accuracy of the facts contained in the waiver. There is a conclusive presumption that a person who executes a waiver pursuant to this subdivision is not covered by workers’ compensation benefits.

(ii) A written waiver that is executed pursuant to this subparagraph and is accepted by the insurance carrier on or before December 31, 2017, may be deemed to be accepted by the insurance carrier as of January 1, 2017. The written waiver shall remain in effect until the officer or member of the board provides the cooperative corporation’s insurance carrier with a written withdrawal of the waiver.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), an officer or director of a private cooperative corporation who is the sole shareholder of the private cooperative corporation, unless the officer, director, or private cooperative corporation has elected to be subject to liability for workers’ compensation pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4151.

(b) (1) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2018.

(2) A policy or contract that is entered into or renewed in compliance with this section is subject to this section as it read on the date that the policy or contract was entered into or renewed.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 3) and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 770, Sec. 4.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Section operative July 1, 2018, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

3352.94.

“Employee” excludes a disaster service worker while performing services as a disaster service worker except as provided in Chapter 10 of this part. “Employee” excludes any unregistered person performing like services as a disaster service worker without pay or other consideration, except as provided by Section 3211.92 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1440.)
-------------------------------------------

3353.

“Independent contractor” means any person who renders service for a specified recompense for a specified result, under the control of his principal as to the result of his work only and not as to the means by which such result is accomplished.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3354.

Employers of employees defined by subdivision (d) of Section 3351 shall not be subject to the provisions of Sections 3710, 3710.1, 3710.2, 3711, 3712, and 3722, or any other penalty provided by law, for failure to secure the payment of compensation for such employees.

This section shall not apply to employers of employees specified in subdivision (b) of Section 3715, with respect to such employees.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

3355.

As used in subdivision (d) of Section 3351, the term “course of trade, business, profession, or occupation” includes all services tending toward the preservation, maintenance, or operation of the business, business premises, or business property of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

3356.

As used in subdivision (d) of Section 3351 and in Section 3355, the term “trade, business, profession, or occupation” includes any undertaking actually engaged in by the employer with some degree of regularity, irrespective of the trade name, articles of incorporation, or principal business of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

3357.

Any person rendering service for another, other than as an independent contractor, or unless expressly excluded herein, is presumed to be an employee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3358.

Watchmen for nonindustrial establishments, paid by subscription by several persons, are not employees under this division. In other cases where watchmen, paid by subscription by several persons, have at the time of the injury sustained by them taken out and maintained in force insurance upon themselves as self-employing persons, conferring benefits equal to those conferred by this division, the employer is not liable under this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3360.

Workmen associating themselves under a partnership agreement, the principal purpose of which is the performance of the labor on a particular piece of work are employees of the person having such work executed. In respect to injuries which occur while such workmen maintain in force insurance in an insurer, insuring to themselves and all persons employed by them benefits identical with those conferred by this division the person for whom such work is to be done is not liable as an employer under this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

3361.

Each member registered as an active firefighting member of any regularly organized volunteer fire department, having official recognition, and full or partial support of the government of the county, city, town, or district in which the volunteer fire department is located, is an employee of that county, city, town, or district for the purposes of this division, and is entitled to receive compensation from the county, city, town or district in accordance with the provisions thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 114, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3361.5.

Notwithstanding Section 3351, a volunteer, unsalaried person authorized by the governing board of a recreation and park district to perform volunteer services for the district shall, upon the adoption of a resolution of the governing board of the district so declaring, be deemed an employee of the district for the purposes of this division and shall be entitled to the workers’ compensation benefits provided by this division for any injury sustained by him or her while engaged in the performance of any service under the direction and control of the governing board of the recreation and park district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 134.)
-------------------------------------------

3362.

Each male or female member registered as an active policeman or policewoman of any regularly organized police department having official recognition and full or partial support of the government of the county, city, town or district in which such police department is located, shall, upon the adoption of a resolution by the governing body of the county, city, town or district so declaring, be deemed an employee of such county, city, town or district for the purpose of this division and shall be entitled to receive compensation from such county, city, town or district in accordance with the provisions thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1650.)
-------------------------------------------

3362.5.
